Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Rights of Residential Service Recipients

33-4-101. Right to receive visitors — Right to communicate with family, attorney, physician, minister and courts.

A person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability is entitled to:

Receive visitors during regular visiting hours; and

Communicate, orally or by sending and receiving uncensored mail, with the service recipient's family, attorney, personal physician, minister, and the courts.

All other incoming mail or parcels may be read or opened before being delivered to a service recipient, if the chief officer of the facility believes the action is necessary for the physical or mental health of the service recipient who is the intended recipient. Mail or other communication that is not delivered to the service recipient for whom it is intended shall be returned immediately to the sender.

The chief officer may make reasonable rules regarding visitors, visiting hours, and the use of communication resources.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 33-4-101 — 33-4-103, 33-4-105, 33-4-107 — 33-4-109, 33-4-111 — 33-4-113 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; T.C.A., §§ 33-4-106, 33-4-107, 33-7-110; 1996, ch. 795, §§ 1-10. Former § 33-4-104 was merged with § 33-4-103 by Acts 1996, ch. 795, § 3; § 33-4-106, which was transferred to § 33-4-105 in 1996; and § 33-4-110, which was transferred to the second sentence of § 33-4-109 in 1996, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-4-102. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-4-102 (Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 5; 1974, ch. 802, § 19; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, § 3; 1983, ch. 323, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-306; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 3; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-8; 1986, ch. 570, § 3; 1989, ch. 513, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-33; T.C.A., § 33-3-104; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.), concerning the services and supports to be provided to persons with a mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability and related record keeping requirements, was transferred to § 33-3-101(c) in 2002.

33-4-103. Notice of admission to guardian or family.

If a person is admitted to a hospital, developmental center, or other residential service on the application of any person other than the person's parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse or adult next of kin, the chief officer shall immediately notify the person's parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse, or adult next of kin, if known.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 45; T.C.A., § 33-608; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 17; 1996, ch. 1079, § 62; T.C.A., § 33-6-107; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Informing patients of rights, § 33-4-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 3.

33-4-104. Treatment for physical disorder prior to admission.

In considering an applicant for admission, if it appears that the person has a physical disorder that requires immediate medical care and the admitting facility cannot appropriately provide the medical care, the person shall be taken first to a physician or hospital for treatment of the medical condition. When the person has received appropriate medical attention and treatment, the person may then be transported to the appropriate facility for treatment of the person's mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 18; 1974, ch. 802, § 20; 1975, ch. 248, § 6; 1976, ch. 489, § 2; 1978, ch. 533, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-307; Acts 1985, ch. 437, §§ 9, 10; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 34, 35; T.C.A., § 33-3-105(b); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-105. Written statement of release procedures and other rights.

Upon admission of a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability to a hospital, developmental center, or other residential service, the chief officer shall provide the person a written statement outlining in simple, non-technical language all release procedures and all other rights of persons under this title. The chief officer shall have the service recipient informed in language understood by the service recipient, including the service recipient's native language or sign language, if appropriate. The chief officer also shall provide the written statement to the person's parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse or other nearest known adult relative. The chief officer shall provide reasonable means and arrangements for assisting the person in making and presenting requests for release, including petitions to the proper court.

The service recipient shall sign on the line for signature to acknowledge having been informed of the service recipient's rights orally and in writing. The service recipient's signature shall be acknowledged in writing by at least one (1) disinterested witness.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 5; 1974, ch. 802, § 19; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, § 3; 1983, ch. 323, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-306; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 3; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-8, 33; 1986, ch. 570, § 3; 1989, ch. 513, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-33; T.C.A., §§ 33-3-104(8), 33-3-111; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

33-4-106. Unauthorized leave from facility.

If a person admitted under court order leaves a hospital, developmental center, or other residential service without authority, the chief officer shall immediately notify the court regardless of the length of the person's absence. If the person is taken into custody, the person may be returned to the facility upon an order by the court. After thirty (30) days absence the person may be dropped from the facility's records. A return after thirty (30) days absence is a new admission. A person's absence beyond thirty (30) days does not limit the power of the court to order the person's return to a facility under this section.

The committing court shall be notified of the policy regarding temporary leave, and the court shall be given an opportunity to register its objection to granting temporary leave. An objection by the court does not prohibit authorization of leave. Temporary leave is not a discharge from the facility.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 23; 1974, ch. 802, § 30; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-317; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 30, 31, 113; T.C.A., § 33-3-106(a)(1)-(3); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 24.

33-4-107. Commitment to private facility — Certificate by disinterested professional.

If a person is proposed to be committed to a private facility under this title, at least one (1) of the required certificates of need shall be from a professional who is not an employee of the private facility.

For purposes of this section, employment as a faculty member by a school of medicine at a university or college associated with a hospital shall not constitute employment at a private facility.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 16; T.C.A., § 33-346; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 7; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-3-109; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-4-108. Certificate of need — Basis — Contents — Violation.

A certificate of need for commitment for care and treatment of a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability is not valid for any purpose unless it is based on personal observation and examination of the person made by the professional not more than three (3) days prior to the making of the certificate. The certificate shall state the facts and reasoning on which the opinions and conclusions are based.

The execution of a certificate concerning the mental condition of a person by a professional who has not personally observed and examined the person is a Class E felony.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 33-347, 33-3-110; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

33-4-109. Notice to court, legal custodian and guardian or next of kin of death of patient or resident — Disposal of unclaimed property after discharge or death.

Upon the death of a person admitted to a facility under court order under this title, the chief officer of the facility shall mail written notice of the cause of death to the court that entered the order. Upon the death of a person who was admitted voluntarily, the chief officer shall notify the next of kin of the cause of death. The notice shall be mailed within ten (10) days of the death.

Notice of a death shall also be given promptly to the person's next of kin and legal guardian, legal custodian, or conservator. The administrator, executor or personal representative of the deceased person, or if there is none, one (1) or more of the heirs at law or next of kin, shall be notified by registered mail of the deceased's personal property at the facility at the time of death. Notice to an administrator, executor or personal representative shall be directed to the probate court of the county in which that person is qualified to administer the estate of the deceased.

Property left by the deceased person in the facility shall be disposed of pursuant to subsection (e) if, after diligent search and inquiry, none of the persons required to be notified can be found and notified or if the persons notified do not open the estate or otherwise proceed to dispose of the estate in a lawful manner.

If a person is discharged and leaves personal property in the facility, the chief officer shall promptly notify the person by registered mail addressed to the person's last known address that the property has been left and is subject to sale under subsection (e) if not claimed.

The chief officer shall keep the deceased or discharged person's personal property for six (6) months if it is not claimed. The chief officer shall then sell the property, with the approval of the commissioner, and deposit the proceeds in a fund, maintained under the supervision of the chief officer, for the benefit of needy service recipients.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 25; 1974, ch. 802, § 31; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 5, 6; T.C.A., § 33-318; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 36; T.C.A., § 33-3-107; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-114.

33-4-110. Inability to exercise rights — Appointment of a conservator.

If the chief officer of a facility in which a service recipient is hospitalized or admitted is of the opinion that the service recipient is unable to exercise any of the rights afforded by this chapter and chapter 3 of this title, the chief officer shall notify immediately the service recipient and the service recipient's attorney, parent, legal custodian, spouse or other nearest known adult relative of the fact, and the chief officer may file for the appointment of a conservator and shall notify those persons as to whether the chief officer intends to do so.

Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 9.